District of Columbia statutes.
25-826

Summary revocation or suspension.

(a)

If the Board determines, after investigation, that the operations of a licensee present an imminent danger to the health and safety of the public, the Board may summarily revoke, suspend, fine, or restrict, without a hearing, the license to sell alcoholic beverages in the District.

(b)

The Board, after investigation, may summarily revoke, suspend, fine, or restrict the license of a licensee whose establishment has been the scene of an assault on a police officer, government inspector or investigator, or other governmental official, who was acting in his or her official capacity, when such assault occurred by patrons who were within 1,000 feet of the establishment.

(c)

A licensee may request a hearing within 3 business days after service of notice of a summary revocation, suspension, fine, or restriction of license. The Board shall hold a hearing within 2 business days of receipt of a timely request and shall issue a decision within 3 business days after the hearing.

(d)

A person aggrieved by a final summary action may file an appeal in accordance with the procedures set forth in subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§  2-501 et seq.].

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 330, ch. 4, § 17
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 900, ch. 756, § 9
Aug. 25, 1937, 50 Stat. 803, ch. 766, § 3
Apr. 26, 1950, 64 Stat. 88, ch. 106
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 3(a)
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 9, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(5), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 11, 34 DCR 907
Sept. 11, 1993, D.C. Law 10-12, § 2(b), 40 DCR 4020
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(h), 41 DCR 1658
Apr. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-97, § 2, 45 DCR 1517
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-201, § 6(b), 55 DCR 6289
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(ff), 60 DCR 3410
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-270, § 2(f)(3), 62 DCR 1866

Section References

This section is referenced in § 25-821 and § 25-827.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-826.
1973 Ed., § 25-118.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-201, in subsec. (a), substituted “suspend, fine,” for “suspend,”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-310 inserted “after investigation” following “The Board” in (b).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-270 rewrote (c).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of (b), see § 2(ff) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(ff) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).